apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="stimul/us__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uset</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usens</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usets</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usens</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="domini/on__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mix/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erns</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rars</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersarna</l>   <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarnas</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersarnas</l>  <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jojo__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rs</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rnas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="flim/mer__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mers</l>      <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rets</l>      <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="yxham/mare__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>mare</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mares</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>maren</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>marens</l>    <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mare</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rars</l>      <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mares</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarnas</l>    <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hum__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="vajsing">         <i>vajsing</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="yxhammare">       <i>yxham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="shaker">          <i>shak</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gaskammare">      <i>gaskam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="märkhammare">     <i>märkham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="livrustkammare">  <i>livrustkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vakuumkammare">   <i>vakuumkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sitter">          <i>sitt</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="efterbrännkammare"><i>efterbrännkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="semitrailer">     <i>semitrail</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tanker">          <i>tank</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stångjärnshammare"><i>stångjärnsham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sängkammare">     <i>sängkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="jojo">            <i>jojo</i><par n="jojo__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skanner">         <i>skann</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ragnarök">        <i>ragnarök</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="jungfrukammare">  <i>jungfrukam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="babysitter">      <i>babysitt</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="scanner">         <i>scann</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="embarras">        <i>embarras</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="tryckkammare">    <i>tryckkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trailer">         <i>trail</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tortyrkammare">   <i>tortyrkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="synopsis">        <i>synopsis</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="studerkammare">   <i>studerkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stånghammare">    <i>stångham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="drätselkammare">  <i>drätselkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="schlager">        <i>schlag</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gnistkammare">    <i>gnistkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fallhammare">     <i>fallham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mixer">           <i>mix</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spiskammare">     <i>spiskam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bräckhammare">    <i>bräckham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klimatkammare">   <i>klimatkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rötkammare">      <i>rötkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="svephammare">     <i>svepham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klädkammare">     <i>klädkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="magmakammare">    <i>magmakam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="auktionskammare"> <i>auktionskam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="oljetanker">      <i>oljetank</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hum">             <i>hum</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="rustkammare">     <i>rustkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vindskammare">    <i>vindskam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stimulus">        <i>stimul</i><par n="stimul/us__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="exodus">          <i>exodus</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="gråben">          <i>gråben</i><par n="hum__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="dimkammare">      <i>dimkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bubbelkammare">   <i>bubbelkam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slägghammare">    <i>släggham</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="handelskammare">  <i>handelskam</i><par n="yxham/mare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="supertanker">     <i>supertank</i><par n="mix/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dominion">        <i>domini</i><par n="domini/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skimmer">         <i>skim</i><par n="flim/mer__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="flimmer">         <i>flim</i><par n="flim/mer__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="glimmer">         <i>glim</i><par n="flim/mer__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hjärtflimmer">    <i>hjärtflim</i><par n="flim/mer__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="slammer">         <i>slam</i><par n="flim/mer__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sagoskimmer">     <i>sagoskim</i><par n="flim/mer__n_nt"/></e>
